Montana, session 2025, HB568.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Short title. [Sections 1 and 2] may be cited as the "Montana Hunters First Act".
Section 2. Nonresident hunting impact study. (1) The department of fish, wildlife, and parks shall
conduct a study of nonresident impacts on deer, and elk, upland game bird, and water fowl hunting in the state
and in each of the fish and wildlife commission's administrative regions.
(2) The study must utilize a range of data, including but not limited to hunter days, harvest
reporting, use of lands that are part of hunting access programs, hunting pressure on public lands, elk and deer
population trends, and licensing.
(3) Upon completion of the study, the department shall publish a report that is accessible to the
public. The report must include:
(a) a comprehensive assessment of the data as it relates to nonresident impacts on deer and elk
hunting in the state and in each of the commission's administrative regions;
(b) specific information about the methods used for collecting or acquiring data used in the report;
and
(c) the identification of specific issues for consideration by the legislature, department, and
commission concerning nonresident impacts on deer and elk hunting.
(4) The study and report must be completed by December 1, 2026.
Section 3. Effective date. [This act] is effective on passage and approval.
Section 4. Termination. [Sections 1 and 2] terminate December 31, 2026.
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 568
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
HB 568, originated in the House.
___________________________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

HOUSE BILL NO. 568
INTRODUCED BY C. SPRUNGER, W. GALT, E. ALBUS, J. SECKINGER, P. ELVERUM, M. THIEL, M.
BERTOGLIO, E. BUTTREY, S. GIST, L. JONES, G. LAMMERS, D. LOGE, B. LER, J. ETCHART, G. HERTZ,
G. PARRY, K. SEEKINS-CROWE, S. MANESS, K. BOGNER, J. HINKLE
AN ACT ESTABLISHING THE MONTANA HUNTERS FIRST ACT; CREATING A STUDY OF IMPACTS ON
MONTANA'S HUNTING SEASONS RELATED TO BLOCK MANAGEMENT, SEASON STRUCTURE, AND
RESIDENT AND NONRESIDENT LICENSE ALLOCATION; ASSIGNING RESPONSIBILITY FOR THE STUDY
TO THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH, WILDLIFE, AND PARKS; DEFINING THE SCOPE OF THE STUDY;
REQUIRING A PUBLISHED REPORT THAT INCLUDES RECOMMENDATIONS; AND PROVIDING AN
IMMEDIATE EFFECTIVE DATE AND A TERMINATION DATE.”